Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.920

Effective date—1969 c 133.

This chapter is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 1, 1969.

[ 1969 c 133 s 21.]